Utah statutes.
34-34-6.   Conduct forcing violation of act illegal -- Peaceful and orderly
solicitation excepted.
Any person, firm, association, corporation, labor union, labor organization or
any other type of association engaging in lockouts, layoffs, boycotts,
picketing, work stoppages, or other conduct, a purpose of which is to compel
or force any other person, firm, association, corporation, labor union, labor
organization or any other type of association to violate any provision of this
chapter shall be guilty of illegal conduct contrary to public policy; but
nothing herein contained shall be construed to prevent or make illegal the
peaceful and orderly solicitation and persuasion by members of a labor union,
labor organization or any other type of association of others to join a labor
union, labor organization or any other type of association, unaccompanied by
any intimidation, use of force, threat of use of force, reprisal, or threat of
reprisal.
